Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.02
Martin Luther King, Jr. Day; manner of observance.

January 15 of each year shall be Martin Luther King, Jr. Day, and shall be set apart for holding suitable exercises in the schools of the state in recognition of the sacrifices of the late Martin Luther King, Jr., and his contributions to the betterment of society.

Laws 1978, LB 329, § 1.

Legal holiday declared for birthday of Martin Luther King, Jr., see sections 25-2221, 62-301, 81-113, and 84-1001.